Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 2. Name, Registered Agent, Registered Office, and Service on Corporation.

Sec. 10.06.105.
Corporate name.

A corporate name must contain the word “corporation”, “company”, “incorporated”, or “limited”, or an abbreviation of one of these words. The corporate name may not contain a word or phrase that indicates or implies that the corporation is organized for a purpose other than the purpose contained in its articles of incorporation.

The corporate name may not contain the word “city”, “borough”, or “village” or otherwise imply that the corporation is a municipality. The name of a city, borough, or village may be used in the corporate name.

A person may not adopt a name that contains the word “corporation”, “incorporated”, or “limited”, or an abbreviation of one of these words, unless the person has been issued a certificate of incorporation, or, in the case of a foreign corporation, a certificate of authority, by the commissioner. This subsection does not prohibit a limited liability company or a limited partnership from using the word “limited” or an abbreviation of “limited” in its name.

A corporate name must be distinguishable on the records of the department from the name of any other organized entity and from a reserved or registered name. The department may adopt regulations to enforce this subsection. In this subsection, “organized entity” and “reserved or registered name” have the meanings given in AS

10.35.040

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 3 ch 82 SLA 1989; am § 2 ch 99 SLA 1994; am §§ 3, 4 ch 50 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

For applicability of amendments to this section made by §§ 3 and 4, ch. 50, SLA 1999, see § 36(a) and (b), ch. 50, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.06.110.
Reservation of corporate name.

The exclusive right to the use of a corporate name may be reserved by a

person intending to organize a corporation under this chapter;

domestic corporation intending to change its name;

foreign corporation intending to apply for a certificate of authority to transact business in this state;

foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state and intending to change its name; or

person intending to organize a foreign corporation and to have it apply for a certificate of authority to transact business in this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.115.
Application for and duration of reservation of name.

Reservation of a corporate name is made by filing an application with the commissioner. If the commissioner finds that the name is available for corporate use under AS

10.06.105(d)

, the commissioner shall reserve it for the exclusive use of the applicant for a period of 120 days.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 5 ch 50 SLA 1999)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.06.120.
Transfer of reserved name.

The holder of a reserved corporate name may transfer the right to the exclusive use of the corporate name to another person by filing a notice of transfer with the commissioner, signed by the holder of the name, and specifying the name and address of the transferee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.125.
Registration of corporate name.

A corporation organized and existing under the laws of a state or territory of the United States may register its corporate name if the name is available for corporate use under AS

10.06.105(d)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 6 ch 50 SLA 1999)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.06.130.
Exclusive right to use name; remedies.

A corporation that is organized under this chapter has the exclusive right to the name under which it was organized. A foreign corporation that has obtained a certificate of authority under this chapter has the exclusive right to the name under which it received its certificate of authority. A corporation that has registered a name under AS

10.06.125

has the exclusive right to the use of the registered name.

A corporation with the exclusive right to a name under (a) of this section

may enjoin the use of a name that is not distinguishable on the records of the department from the name to which the corporation has the exclusive right under (a) of this section;

has a cause of action for damages against a person who uses a name that is not distinguishable on the records of the department from the name to which the corporation has the exclusive right under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 82 SLA 1989; am § 7 ch 50 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

For applicability of amendments to this section made by § 7, ch. 50, SLA 1999, see § 36(a) and (b), ch. 50, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Collateral references. —

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations, §§ 235 – 244.

18 C.J.S., Corporations, § 132 et seq.

Right to protection of corporate name, as between domestic corporation and foreign corporation not qualified to do business in state. 26 ALR3d 994.

Incorporation of company under particular name as creating exclusive right to such name. 68 ALR3d 1168.

Use of “family name” by corporation as unfair competition. 72 ALR3d 8.

Sec. 10.06.135.
Procedure for registration of corporate name.

Registration of a corporate name is made by filing with the commissioner

an application for registration executed by an officer of the corporation setting out the name of the corporation, the state or territory under the laws of which it is incorporated, the date of incorporation, a statement that it is doing business, and a brief statement of its business; and

a certificate from an official of the state or territory where the corporation is organized who has custody of the records pertaining to corporations stating that the corporation is in good standing under the laws of that state or territory.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.140.
Fee for and duration of registered name.

The fee for registration of a corporate name shall be established by the department by regulation.

The registration is effective until the close of the calendar year in which the application for registration is filed unless terminated earlier by involuntary dissolution in accordance with AS

10.06.633

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.06.145.
Renewal of registered name.

A corporation that has registered its corporate name may renew the registration each year by (1) filing an application for renewal setting out the facts required in an original application for registration; (2) filing a certificate of good standing required for an original registration; and (3) paying a fee established by the department by regulation. An application for renewal shall be filed between October 1 and December 31 in each year. The renewal extends the registration for the following calendar year.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.06.150.
Registered office and registered agent.

A corporation shall continuously maintain in this state a registered agent and a registered office. The registered office may be the same as the place of business of the corporation. The registered agent may be either an individual resident of this state whose business office is the same as the registered office, or a domestic or foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state whose business office is the same as the registered office.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.155.
Registration of agent by nonresident with controlling interest. [Repealed, § 59 ch 82 SLA 1989.]

Sec. 10.06.160.
Filing list of registered corporations with superior court; updating and publishing. [Repealed, § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994.]

Sec. 10.06.165.
Change of registered office or agent by corporation.

A corporation may change its registered office, agent, or both, by filing with the department a statement signed by the president or a vice-president including

the name of the corporation;

the address of its registered office;

the address of its new registered office if the registered office is to be changed;

the name of its registered agent;

the name of its new registered agent if the registered agent is to be changed; and

a statement that the change is authorized by resolution of its board of directors.

If the commissioner finds that the statement complies with this chapter, the commissioner shall file it in the commissioner’s office. The change becomes effective when the statement is filed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.06.170.
Change by agent or resignation of agent.

A registered agent of a domestic or foreign corporation may change the location of the agent’s office from one address to another in this state. The agent may change the registered office for each corporation for which the person is acting as registered agent by filing in the office of the commissioner a statement setting out (1) the name of the agent; (2) the address of the agent’s office before change; (3) the address to which the office is changed; and (4) a list of corporations for which the person is the registered agent. The statement shall be executed by the registered agent in the individual name of the agent or, if the agent is a corporation, it shall be executed by its president or a vice-president. The statement shall be delivered to the commissioner and, if the commissioner finds that the statement complies with this chapter, the commissioner shall file it in the commissioner’s office. The change becomes effective when the statement is filed.

A registered agent may resign by filing a written notice and an exact copy of the notice with the commissioner. The written notice of resignation shall set out the latest address of the principal office of the corporation and the names, addresses, and titles of the most recent officers of the corporation known by the agent. The commissioner shall immediately mail a copy of the notice to the corporation at its principal office. The resignation becomes effective 30 days after the filing of the written notice, unless the corporation sooner appoints a successor registered agent, as provided in AS

10.06.165

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 5 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.06.175.
Service on corporation.

The registered agent of a corporation is an agent upon whom process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the corporation may be served.

If a corporation fails to appoint or maintain a registered agent in this state, or if its registered agent cannot, with reasonable diligence, be found at the registered office, the commissioner is an agent of the corporation upon whom the process, notice, or demand may be served. A person may serve the commissioner under this subsection by

serving on the commissioner or the designee of the commissioner a copy of the process, notice, or demand, with any papers required by law to be delivered in connection with the service, and a fee established by the department by regulation;

sending to the corporation being served by certified mail a notice that service has been made on the commissioner under this subsection and a copy of the process, notice, or demand and accompanying papers; notice to the corporation shall be sent to

the address of the last registered office of the corporation as shown by the records on file in the office of the commissioner; and

the address, the use of which the person initiating the proceedings knows or, on the basis of reasonable inquiry, has reason to believe is most likely to result in actual notice; and

filing with the appropriate court or other body, as part of the return of service, the return receipt of mailing and an affidavit of the person initiating the proceedings that this section has been complied with.

The commissioner shall keep a record of processes, notices, and demands served upon the commissioner under this section.

This section does not affect the right to serve process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon a corporation in any other manner permitted.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Collateral references. —

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations, §§ 1882 – 1904, 2083.

36
Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations, § 476 et seq.

19 C.J.S., Corporations, §§ 679, 802 et seq.

Service of process upon dissolved domestic corporation in absence of express statutory direction.
75 ALR2d 1399.

Manner of service of process upon foreign corporation which has withdrawn from state. 86 ALR2d 1000.

Attorney representing foreign corporation in litigation as its agent for service of process in unconnected actions or proceedings. 9 ALR3d 738.

Who is “general” or “managing” agent of foreign corporation under statute authorizing service of process on such agent. 17 ALR3d 625.

Validity, construction, and application of “fiduciary shield” doctrine — modern cases.
79 ALR5th 587.